test/src/gt-desc-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Compound nouns.

Tests:
  Noun - alkoholaváddu: # GOAHTI-A SgNom + GOAHTI-U 
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváddu, alkohola-váddu, álkoholaváddu, álkohola-váddu]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen: [alkoholaváttu, alkohola-váttu, alkoholavátto, álkoholaváttu, álkohola-váttu, alkohola-vátto, álkoholavátto, álkohola-vátto]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Acc: [alkoholaváttu, alkohola-váttu, álkoholaváttu, álkohola-váttu]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Loc: [alkoholaváttus, alkohola-váttus, álkohola-váttus, álkoholaváttus]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Ill: [alkoholaváddui, alkohola-váddui, álkoholaváddui, álkohola-váddui]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Com: [alkoholaváttuin, alkohola-váttuin, álkohola-váttuin, álkoholaváttuin]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom: [alkoholaváttut, alkohola-váttut, álkohola-váttuk, alkohola-váttuk, alkoholaváttuk, álkoholaváttut, álkohola-váttut, álkoholaváttuk]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Gen: [alkoholaváttuid, alkohola-váttuid, álkoholaváttuid, álkohola-váttuid]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Acc: [alkoholaváttuid, alkohola-váttuid, álkoholaváttuid, álkohola-váttuid]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Loc: [alkoholaváttuin, alkohola-váttuin, álkohola-váttuin, álkoholaváttuin]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Ill: [alkoholaváttuide, alkohola-váttuide, álkohola-váttuide, álkoholaváttuide]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Com: [alkoholaváttuiguin, alkohola-váttuiguin, álkohola-váttuiguin, álkoholaváttuiguin]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Ess:    [alkoholaváddun, alkohola-váddun, álkohola-váddun, álkoholaváddun]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváttoš, alkohola-váttoš, álkohola-váttoš, álkoholaváttoš]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváttožaš, alkohola-váttožaš, álkohola-váttožaš, álkoholaváttožaš]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváttuheapme, alkoholaváttoheapme, alkohola-váttuheapme, alkohola-váttoheapme, alkohola-váttohin, álkoholaváttuheapmi, álkohola-váttuhin, alkoholaváttoheapmi, alkohola-váttuheapmi, álkohola-váttohin, álkoholaváttuheapme, álkoholaváttoheapme, álkoholaváttoheapmi, alkoholaváttohin, alkoholaváttuheapmi, alkohola-váttuhin, álkohola-váttoheapmi, álkoholaváttuhin, álkoholaváttohin, álkohola-váttoheapme, alkohola-váttoheapmi, álkohola-váttuheapmi, álkohola-váttuheapme, alkoholaváttuhin]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváttolaš, alkohola-váttolaš, álkoholaváttolaš, álkohola-váttolaš]

  Noun - juogusgirji: # MALISLONG SgNom + GOAHTI-I
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirji, juogus-girji]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Gen: [juogusgirjji, juogus-girjji, juogusgirjje, juogus-girjje]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Acc: [juogusgirjji, juogus-girjji]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Loc: [juogusgirjjis, juogus-girjjis]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Ill: [juogusgirjái, juogus-girjái]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Com: [juogusgirjjiin, juogus-girjjiin]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Nom: [juogusgirjjit, juogus-girjjit, juogus-girjjik, juogusgirjjik]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Gen: [juogusgirjjiid, juogus-girjjiid]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Acc: [juogusgirjjiid, juogus-girjjiid]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Loc: [juogusgirjjiin, juogus-girjjiin]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Ill: [juogusgirjjiide, juogus-girjjiide]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Com: [juogusgirjjiiguin, juogus-girjjiiguin]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Ess: [juogusgirjin, juogus-girjin]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirjjáš, juogus-girjjáš]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirjjážaš, juogus-girjjážaš]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirjjiheapme, juogusgirjjeheapme, juogus-girjjiheapme, juogus-girjjeheapme, juogusgirjjihin, juogusgirjjehin, juogusgirjjeheapmi, juogus-girjjeheapmi, juogus-girjjehin, juogusgirjjiheapmi, juogus-girjjiheapmi, juogus-girjjihin]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirjjálaš, juogus-girjjálaš]

  Noun - beroštusgeašluondu: # JOHTOLAT SgNom + MiddleNouns + LUONDU
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Nom: [beroštusgeašluondu, beroštusgeaš-luondu]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Gen: [beroštusgeašluonddu, beroštusgeaš-luonddu]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Acc: [beroštusgeašluonddu, beroštusgeaš-luonddu]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Loc: [beroštusgeašluonddus, beroštusgeaš-luonddus]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Ill: [beroštusgeašlundui, beroštusgeaš-lundui, beroštusgeašluondui, beroštusgeaš-luondui]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Com: [beroštusgeašluondduin, beroštusgeaš-luondduin]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Nom: [beroštusgeašluonddut, beroštusgeaš-luonddut, beroštusgeaš-luondduk, beroštusgeašluondduk]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Gen: [beroštusgeašluondduid, beroštusgeaš-luondduid]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Acc: [beroštusgeašluondduid, beroštusgeaš-luondduid]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Loc: [beroštusgeašluondduin, beroštusgeaš-luondduin]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Ill: [beroštusgeašluondduide, beroštusgeaš-luondduide]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Com: [beroštusgeašluondduiguin, beroštusgeaš-luondduiguin]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Ess: [beroštusgeašluondun, beroštusgeaš-luondun]
